Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Chapter 2. State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

§ 37.2-200.
State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

The State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services is established as a policy board, within the meaning of §

2.2-2100

, in the executive branch of government. The Board shall consist of nine nonlegislative citizen members to be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. The nine members shall consist of one individual who is receiving or who has received services, one family member of an individual who is receiving or who has received services, one individual who is receiving or who has received services or family member of such individual, one elected local government official, one psychiatrist licensed to practice in Virginia, and four citizens of the Commonwealth at large. The Governor, in appointing the psychiatrist member, may make his selection from nominations submitted by the Medical Society of Virginia in collaboration with the Psychiatric Society of Virginia and the Northern Virginia Chapter of the Washington Psychiatric Society.

Appointments shall be made for terms of four years each, except appointments to fill vacancies that shall be for the unexpired terms of vacated appointments. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. All members may be reappointed. However, no member shall be eligible to serve more than two four-year terms. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment. No person shall serve more than a total of 12 years. Members of the Board may be suspended or removed by the Governor at his pleasure.

Members of the Board shall receive compensation for their services and shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. The Board is authorized to employ a secretary to assist in the Board’s administrative duties. The compensation of the secretary shall be fixed by the Board within the specific limits of the appropriation made therefor by the General Assembly, and the compensation shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2. The secretary shall perform the duties required of him by the Board. The Department and all other agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Board upon request.

The main office of the Board shall be in the City of Richmond. The Board shall meet quarterly and at such other times as it deems proper. The Board shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership. The meetings of the Board shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request. Five members shall constitute a quorum.

The chairman of the Board shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly an annual executive summary of the activity and work of the Board no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-27 to 37-31; 1956, c. 105; 1968, cc. 477, 502, §§ 37.1-3 to 37.1-7; 1974, c. 509; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1993, c. 178; 1998, c. 447; 2002, c. 50; 2005, c. 716; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 813 and 840, cl. 2 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect until such time as amended or repealed by the State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board” at the beginning of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “one individual who is receiving or who has received services, one family member of a an individual who is receiving or who has received services, one individual who is receiving or who has received services or family member of such individual,” for “one consumer or former consumer, one family member of a consumer or former consumer, one consumer or former consumer or family member of a consumer or former consumer,” in the third sentence of subsection A.

§ 37.2-201.
Internal evaluation committee of Board.

The Board shall appoint an internal evaluation committee to be composed of at least three members of the Board who shall review and evaluate the effects of designated policies of the Board and the performance of the Department, state facilities, community services boards, and behavioral health authorities in carrying out those policies. The committee and any staff designated by the Commissioner shall have access to all records of the Department, state facilities, community services boards, and behavioral health authorities in carrying out these monitoring activities. The committee shall report its findings to the Board, which shall take action thereon as it deems appropriate.

History.

1980, c. 582, § 37.1-10.1; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-202.
Members not eligible for positions in Department.

No member of the Board shall be eligible for any position in the Department during the term for which he is appointed or for 12 months thereafter.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-35; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-19; 1976, c. 671; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-203.
Powers and duties of Board.

The Board shall have the following powers and duties:

To develop and establish programmatic and fiscal policies governing the operation of state hospitals, training centers, community services boards, and behavioral health authorities;

To ensure the development of long-range programs and plans for mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services provided by the Department, community services boards, and behavioral health authorities;

To review and comment on all budgets and requests for appropriations for the Department prior to their submission to the Governor and on all applications for federal funds;

To monitor the activities of the Department and its effectiveness in implementing the policies of the Board;

To advise the Governor, Commissioner, and General Assembly on matters relating to mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services;

To adopt regulations that may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this title and other laws of the Commonwealth administered by the Commissioner or the Department;

To ensure the development of programs to educate citizens about and elicit public support for the activities of the Department, community services boards, and behavioral health authorities;

To ensure that the Department assumes the responsibility for providing for education and training of school-age individuals receiving services in state facilities, pursuant to §

37.2-312

;

To change the names of state facilities; and

To adopt regulations that establish the qualifications, education, and experience for registration of peer recovery specialists by the Board of Counseling.Prior to the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any regulation regarding substance abuse services, the Board shall, in addition to the procedures set forth in the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), present the proposed regulation to the Substance Abuse Services Council, established pursuant to §

2.2-2696

, at least 30 days prior to the Board’s action for the Council’s review and comment.

History.

Code 1950, §§

37-1

, 37-2, 37-4, 37-5, 37-34; 1954, c. 668; 1960, c. 133; 1968, c. 477, §§ 37.1-10, 37.1-34; 1976, cc. 671, 739, § 37.1-223; 1979, c. 41; 1980, c. 582; 1984, c. 720; 1985, c. 207; 1998, c. 724; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2017, cc. 418, 426.

Editor’s note.

Act 2017, c. 136, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (the Board) shall amend 12VAC35-105-20 of the Virginia Administrative Code to include (i) occupational therapists in the definitions of Qualified Mental Health Professional-Adult, Qualified Mental Health Professional-Child, and Qualified Mental Retardation Professional and (ii) occupational therapy assistants in the definition of Qualified Paraprofessional in Mental Health. In amending these definitions, the Board shall require educational and clinical experience for occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants that is substantially equivalent to comparable professionals listed in current regulations.”

Acts 2017, c. 136, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2017, cc. 418 and 426, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and the Board of Counseling shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2018, c. 572, cl. 1 provides: “That the State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall amend regulations governing licensure of providers of behavioral health services to include behavior analysts in the definition of ‘licensed mental health professional.’ ”

Acts 2018, c. 572, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “developmental” for “mental retardation” in subdivisions 2 and 5, and “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” in 8.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 418 and 426 are identical, and inserted subdivision 10 and made related changes.

§ 37.2-203.1.
Licensed provider; statement to prospective employer.

The Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall amend regulations governing licensed providers to require that every licensed provider provide a statement regarding a current or past employee or other individual currently or previously associated with the provider in a capacity that requires a criminal history background check pursuant to §

37.2-416

or

37.2-506

to any other licensed provider with which the current or past employee has applied for employment or to fill a role that requires a criminal history background check pursuant to §

37.2-416

or

37.2-506

. The statement shall address the character, ability, and fitness for employment in or to otherwise fill the role for which the person has applied and shall be provided upon receipt of a request for such information from the other licensed provider and written consent to the disclosure of such information executed by the current or past employee or other individual currently or previously associated with the provider in a capacity that requires a criminal history background check pursuant to § 37.2-416 or 37.2-506. Nothing in the amended regulations shall require disclosure of information subject to privilege or confidentiality pursuant to §

8.01-581.16

,

8.01-581.17

, or

32.1-127.1:03

or federal law.

History.

2019, c. 776, § 32.1-326.4.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 776 was codified as § 32.1-326.4 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission. Effective March 9, 2021, former § 32.1-326.4 was renumbered as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 37.2-204.
Appointments to state and local human rights committees.

The Board shall appoint a state human rights committee that shall appoint local human rights committees to address alleged violations of human rights of individuals receiving services. One-third of the appointments made to the state or local human rights committees shall be individuals who are receiving or who have received services or family members of such individuals, with at least two individuals who are receiving or who have received public or private mental health, developmental, or substance abuse treatment or habilitation services within five years of the date of their initial appointment on each committee. In addition, at least one appointment to the state and each local human rights committee shall be a health care provider. Remaining appointments shall include lawyers and persons with interest, knowledge, or training in the mental health, developmental, or substance abuse services field. No current employee of the Department, a community services board, or a behavioral health authority shall serve as a member of the state human rights committee. No current employee of the Department, a community services board, a behavioral health authority, or any facility, program, or organization licensed or funded by the Department or funded by a community services board or behavioral health authority shall serve as a member of any local human rights committee that serves an oversight function for the employing facility, program, or organization.

History.

1999, c. 969, § 37.1-84.3; 2001, c. 453; 2005, cc. 201, 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 201 amended former § 37.1-84.3, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendments by c. 201 have been given effect in this section as set out above by adding the third sentence and deleting “health care providers” following “lawyers” in the fourth sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and rewrote the first sentence, and substituted “mental health, developmental, or substance abuse services field” for “mental health, mental retardation, or substance abuse field” at the end of the third sentence.